Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8925
Prohibited acts.

It is unlawful for any person to commit or to permit, cause, aid, or abet the commission of any of the following acts in this state:

(1) Any violation of the Veterinary Drug Distribution Licensing Act or rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act;

(2) Providing the department, any of its representatives, or any federal official with false or fraudulent records or making false or fraudulent statements regarding any matter under the act;

(3) Obtaining or attempting to obtain a veterinary legend drug by fraud, deceit, or misrepresentation or engaging in the intentional misrepresentation or fraud in the distribution of a veterinary legend drug;

(4) Except for the distribution by manufacturers of a veterinary legend drug that has been delivered into commerce pursuant to an application approved under federal law by the federal Food and Drug Administration, the manufacture, repackaging, sale, transfer, delivery, holding, or offering for sale of any veterinary legend drug that is adulterated, misbranded, counterfeit, suspected of being counterfeit, or otherwise rendered unfit for distribution;

(5) Except for the wholesale distribution by manufacturers of a veterinary legend drug that has been delivered into commerce pursuant to an application approved under federal law by the federal Food and Drug Administration, the adulteration, misbranding, or counterfeiting of any veterinary legend drug;

(6) The deliberate receipt of any veterinary legend drug that is adulterated, misbranded, stolen, obtained by fraud or deceit, counterfeit, or suspected of being counterfeit and the delivery or proffered delivery of such drug for pay or otherwise;

(7) The alteration, mutilation, destruction, obliteration, or removal of the whole or any part of the labeling of a veterinary legend drug or the commission of any other act with respect to a veterinary legend drug that results in the veterinary legend drug being misbranded;

(8) For purposes of the Veterinary Drug Distribution Licensing Act, the manufacture, repackaging, sale, transfer, delivery, holding, possessing or offering for sale, trade, or any other form of dissemination, any controlled substance; and

(9) Prohibiting or otherwise impeding access, during normal business hours, to any paper or electronic records or any premises, facility, area, or location to which access is authorized by the act.

Laws 2008, LB1022, § 25.